District of Columbia statutes.
7-3006

Confidential records.

All information furnished to APRA pursuant to this chapter shall remain confidential and may be disclosed only to medical personnel for purposes of diagnosis and treatment; except, that with the prior written consent of the client, the information may be disclosed for the purposes of and in accordance with Chapter 2A of this chapter [§ 7-251 et seq.].

History

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-146, § 7, 47 DCR 4350
Dec. 4, 2010, D.C. Law 18-273, § 208, 57 DCR 7171

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-273 substituted “and treatment; except, that with the prior written consent of the client, the information may be disclosed for the purposes of and in accordance with Chapter 2A of this chapter” for “and treatment”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 208 of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-530, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8099).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 208 of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-582, October 20, 2010, 57 DCR 10118).